Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 332.334 is amended to read:
332.334. (1)(a) A  school district, education service district or public charter school shall make
the results of any testing conducted under a plan described in ORS 332.331 available  to the public
no later than 10 business days after receiving the test results. As used in  this paragraph, “business
day” means a day that is not a Saturday, a legal holiday under ORS 187.010 or 187.020  or a day on
which the administrative headquarters for the district or school is closed.
(b) The district or school shall make the test results available  to the public :
(A) [ If the district or school maintains a public website, ] By posting the test results on the
website[ ;] maintained by the district or school; and
(B) By sending electronic mail to staff, students and parents of minor students  for whom the
district or school has electronic mail addresses on file .[; and ]
[(C) By making the test results available in printed form at the administrative headquarters  for the
district or school. ]
(2) A school district, education service district or public charter  school shall provide an annual
statement regarding the plan developed and adopted by the district or  school under ORS 332.331.
The district or school shall provide the statement to:
(a) The governing body for the district or school;
(b) The parents of minor students; and
(c) Any students 18 years of age or older.
(3) The annual  statement under subsection (2) of this section must include[ , but need not be
limited to,] the following information:
(a) Identification of, and  contact information for, the position within the administration of the
school district, education service  district or public charter school having responsibility for main-
taining and overseeing performance of the plan;
(b) Information regarding where copies of the plan are available;
(c) A certification that the district or school is in  compliance with any testing requirements
under the plan;
(d) Information about how to obtain the results of any testing conducted under the plan; and
(e) A summary of major exposure reduction activities conducted under  the plan since the pre-
ceding annual statement.
Enrolled Senate Bill 905 (SB 905-INTRO) Page 1
(4) [If] A school district, education service district or public charter school  [maintains a publicly
available website, the district or school ] shall post the  annual statement described in subsection (3)
of this section on the website  maintained by the district or school . [ The district or school shall
make the annual statement available in  printed form at the administrative headquarters for the district
or school. ]
(5) The Department of Education shall adopt, in consultation with the Oregon Health  Authority,
representatives of school districts, education service districts and public charter  schools and other
interested stakeholders, rules for carrying out this section.
Passed by Senate March 31, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 905 (SB 905-INTRO) Page 2